Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 16. Psychiatric Treatment of Minors Act.

§ 16.1-335.
Short title.

The provisions of this article shall be known and may be cited as “The Psychiatric Treatment of Minors Act.”

History.

1990, c. 975; 2010, cc. 778, 825.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and deleted “Inpatient” following “Psychiatric” in both the Article heading and the text of this section.

§ 16.1-336.
Definitions.

When used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Community services board”
has the same meaning as provided in §

37.2-100

. Whenever the term community services board appears, it shall include behavioral health authority, as that term is defined in §

37.2-100

.

“Consent”
means the voluntary, express, and informed agreement to treatment in a mental health facility by a minor 14 years of age or older and by a parent or a legally authorized custodian.

“Designee of the local community services board”
means an examiner designated by the local community services board who (i) is skilled in the assessment and treatment of mental illness, (ii) has completed a certification program approved by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, (iii) is able to provide an independent examination of the minor, (iv) is not related by blood, marriage, or adoption to, or is not the legal guardian of, the minor being evaluated, (v) has no financial interest in the admission or treatment of the minor being evaluated, (vi) has no investment interest in the facility detaining or admitting the minor under this article, and (vii) except for employees of state hospitals and of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, is not employed by the facility.

“Employee”
means an employee of the local community services board who is skilled in the assessment and treatment of mental illness and has completed a certification program approved by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

“Incapable of making an informed decision”
means unable to understand the nature, extent, or probable consequences of a proposed treatment or unable to make a rational evaluation of the risks and benefits of the proposed treatment as compared with the risks and benefits of alternatives to the treatment. Persons with dysphasia or other communication disorders who are mentally competent and able to communicate shall not be considered incapable of giving informed consent.

“Inpatient treatment”
means placement for observation, diagnosis, or treatment of mental illness in a psychiatric hospital or in any other type of mental health facility determined by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services to be substantially similar to a psychiatric hospital with respect to restrictions on freedom and therapeutic intrusiveness.

“Investment interest”
means the ownership or holding of an equity or debt security, including shares of stock in a corporation, interests or units of a partnership, bonds, debentures, notes, or other equity or debt instruments.

“Judge”
means a juvenile and domestic relations district judge. In addition, “judge” includes a retired judge sitting by designation pursuant to §

16.1-69.35

, substitute judge, or special justice authorized by §

37.2-803

who has completed a training program regarding the provisions of this article, prescribed by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

“Least restrictive alternative”
means the treatment and conditions of treatment which, separately and in combination, are no more intrusive or restrictive of freedom than reasonably necessary to achieve a substantial therapeutic benefit or to protect the minor or others from physical injury.

“Mental health facility”
means a public or private facility for the treatment of mental illness operated or licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

“Mental illness”
means a substantial disorder of the minor’s cognitive, volitional, or emotional processes that demonstrably and significantly impairs judgment or capacity to recognize reality or to control behavior. “Mental illness” may include substance abuse, which is the use, without compelling medical reason, of any substance which results in psychological or physiological dependency as a function of continued use in such a manner as to induce mental, emotional, or physical impairment and cause socially dysfunctional or socially disordering behavior. Intellectual disability, head injury, a learning disability, or a seizure disorder is not sufficient, in itself, to justify a finding of mental illness within the meaning of this article.

“Minor”
means a person less than 18 years of age.

“Parent”
means (i) a biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the minor, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint decree or agreement, (ii) a biological or adoptive parent with whom the minor regularly resides, (iii) a person judicially appointed as a legal guardian of the minor, or (iv) a person who exercises the rights and responsibilities of legal custody by delegation from a biological or adoptive parent, upon provisional adoption or otherwise by operation of law. The director of the local department of social services, or his designee, may stand as the minor’s parent when the minor is in the legal custody of the local department of social services.

“Qualified evaluator”
means a psychiatrist or a psychologist licensed in Virginia by either the Board of Medicine or the Board of Psychology, or if such psychiatrist or psychologist is unavailable, (i) any mental health professional licensed in Virginia through the Department of Health Professions as a clinical social worker, professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, psychiatric nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist, or (ii) any mental health professional employed by a community services board. All qualified evaluators shall (a) be skilled in the diagnosis and treatment of mental illness in minors, (b) be familiar with the provisions of this article, and (c) have completed a certification program approved by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The qualified evaluator shall (1) not be related by blood, marriage, or adoption to, or is not the legal guardian of, the minor being evaluated, (2) not be responsible for treating the minor, (3) have no financial interest in the admission or treatment of the minor, (4) have no investment interest in the facility detaining or admitting the minor under this article, and (5) except for employees of state hospitals, the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, and community services boards, not be employed by the facility.

“Treatment”
means any planned intervention intended to improve a minor’s functioning in those areas which show impairment as a result of mental illness.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2008, cc. 139, 774; 2009, cc. 455, 555, 813, 840; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and added the definition of “Judge.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 139 and 774 are identical, and inserted the paragraph defining “Incapable of making an informed decision.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted the “Community services board” definition and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” in the definition of “Inpatient treatment”; and in the paragraph defining “Mental health facility,” substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and added the definitions of
“Designee of the local community services board,” “Employee,” and “Investment interest”; and rewrote the definition of “Qualified evaluator.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in the paragraph defining “Mental illness,” substituted “Intellectual disability” for “Mental retardation” at the beginning of the third sentence.

§ 16.1-336.1.
Admission forms.

The Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall prepare the petitions, orders, and such other legal forms as may be required in proceedings for custody, detention, and involuntary admission pursuant to this article, and shall distribute such forms to the clerks of the juvenile and domestic relations district courts of the Commonwealth. The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall prepare the preadmission screening report, evaluation, and such other clinical forms as may be required in proceedings for custody, detention, and admission pursuant to this article, and shall distribute such forms to community services boards, mental health care providers, and directors of state facilities.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825.

§ 16.1-337.
Inpatient treatment of minors; general applicability; disclosure of records.

A minor may be admitted to a mental health facility for inpatient treatment only pursuant to §

16.1-338

,

16.1-339

, or

16.1-340.1

or in accordance with an order of involuntary commitment entered pursuant to §§

16.1-341

through

16.1-345

. The provisions of Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.) of Chapter 11 and §

16.1-337.1

relating to the confidentiality of files, papers, and records shall apply to proceedings under this article.

Any health care provider, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

, or other provider rendering services to a minor who is the subject of proceedings under this article, upon request, shall disclose to a magistrate, the juvenile intake officer, the court, the minor’s attorney, the minor’s guardian ad litem, the qualified evaluator performing the evaluation required under §§

16.1-338

,

16.1-339

, and

16.1-342

, the community services board or its designee performing the evaluation, preadmission screening, or monitoring duties under this article, or a law-enforcement officer any and all information that is necessary and appropriate to enable each of them to perform his duties under this article. These health care providers and other service providers shall disclose to one another health records and information where necessary to provide care and treatment to the person and to monitor that care and treatment. Health records disclosed to a law-enforcement officer shall be limited to information necessary to protect the officer, the minor, or the public from physical injury or to address the health care needs of the minor. Information disclosed to a law-enforcement officer shall not be used for any other purpose, disclosed to others, or retained.Any health care provider providing services to a minor who is the subject of proceedings under this article shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the minor’s parent of information that is directly relevant to such individual’s involvement with the minor’s health care, which may include the minor’s location and general condition, in accordance with subdivision D 34 of §

32.1-127.1:03

, unless the provider has actual knowledge that the parent is currently prohibited by court order from contacting the minor. No health care provider shall be required to notify a person’s family member or personal representative pursuant to this section if the health care provider has actual knowledge that such notice has been provided.Any health care provider disclosing records pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any harm resulting from the disclosure, including any liability under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.), as amended, unless the person or provider disclosing such records intended the harm or acted in bad faith.

Any order entered where a minor is the subject of proceedings under this article shall provide for the disclosure of health records pursuant to subsection B. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1992, c. 539; 2008, cc. 782, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2016, cc. 569, 693; 2018, c. 846.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 846, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 782, 850 and 870 are identical, and
designated the existing provisions of this section as subsection A; added subsections B and C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and deleted “or behavioral health authority” following “board” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “16.1-340.1” for “16.1-340” and “this article” for “§§

16.1-339

through

16.1-345

”; and in subsection B, deleted “as required in §

16.1-343

” following “minor’s attorney,” substituted “the qualified evaluator performing the evaluation” for “the evaluator as,” inserted “or its designee,” and added the second paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 569 and 693 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “this article shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the minor’s parent of information that” for “this article may notify the minor’s parent of information which,” and added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 846, effective April 18, 2018, substituted “and §

16.1-337.1

” for “of this title” following “Chapter 11” in subsection A.

§ 16.1-337.1.
Order of involuntary commitment or mandatory outpatient treatment forwarded to Central Criminal Records Exchange; certain voluntary admissions forwarded to Central Criminal Records Exchange; firearm background check.

The order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this article for involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment for a minor 14 years of age or older and the certification of any minor 14 years of age or older who has been the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

and who, after being advised by the court that he will be prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

, subsequently agreed to voluntary admission pursuant to §

16.1-338

shall be filed by the court with the clerk of the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the county or city where the hearing took place as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next business day following the completion of the hearing.

Upon receipt of any order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this article for involuntary admission of a minor 14 years of age or older to a facility, the clerk of court shall, as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next following business day, certify and forward to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, a copy of the order. Upon receipt of any order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this article for mandatory outpatient treatment of a minor 14 years of age or older, the clerk of court shall, prior to the close of that business day, certify and forward to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, a copy of the order.

The clerk of court shall also, as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next following business day, forward upon receipt to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, certification of any minor 14 years of age or older who has been the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

and who, after being advised by the court that he will be prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

, subsequently agreed to voluntary admission pursuant to §

16.1-338

.

Except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

19.2-389

, the copy of the forms and orders sent to the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to subsection B, and the forms and certifications sent to the Central Criminal Records Exchange regarding voluntary admission pursuant to subsection C, shall be kept confidential in a separate file and used only to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm. No medical records shall be forwarded to the Central Criminal Records Exchange with any form, order, or certification required by subsection B or C. The Department of State Police shall forward only a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System.

History.

2018, c. 846.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 846, cl. 3 made this section effective April 18, 2018, by emergency clause.

§ 16.1-338.
Parental admission of minors younger than 14 and nonobjecting minors 14 years of age or older.

A minor younger than 14 years of age may be admitted to a willing mental health facility for inpatient treatment upon application and with the consent of a parent. A minor 14 years of age or older may be admitted to a willing mental health facility for inpatient treatment upon the joint application and consent of the minor and the minor’s parent.

Admission of a minor under this section shall be approved by a qualified evaluator who has conducted a personal examination of the minor within 48 hours after admission and has made the following written findings:

The minor appears to have a mental illness serious enough to warrant inpatient treatment and is reasonably likely to benefit from the treatment; and

The minor has been provided with a clinically appropriate explanation of the nature and purpose of the treatment; and

If the minor is 14 years of age or older, that he has been provided with an explanation of his rights under this Act as they would apply if he were to object to admission, and that he has consented to admission; and

All available modalities of treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment have been considered and no less restrictive alternative is available that would offer comparable benefits to the minor.If admission is sought to a state hospital, the community services board serving the area in which the minor resides shall provide, in lieu of the examination required by this section, a preadmission screening report conducted by an employee or designee of the community services board and shall ensure that the necessary written findings have been made before approving the admission. A copy of the written findings of the evaluation or preadmission screening report required by this section shall be provided to the consenting parent and the parent shall have the opportunity to discuss the findings with the qualified evaluator or employee or designee of the community services board.

Within 10 days after the admission of a minor under this section, the director of the facility or the director’s designee shall ensure that an individualized plan of treatment has been prepared by the provider responsible for the minor’s treatment and has been explained to the parent consenting to the admission and to the minor. The minor shall be involved in the preparation of the plan to the maximum feasible extent consistent with his ability to understand and participate, and the minor’s family shall be involved to the maximum extent consistent with the minor’s treatment needs. The plan shall include a preliminary plan for placement and aftercare upon completion of inpatient treatment and shall include specific behavioral and emotional goals against which the success of treatment may be measured. A copy of the plan shall be provided to the minor and to his parents.

If the parent who consented to a minor’s admission under this section revokes his consent at any time, or if a minor 14 or older objects at any time to further treatment, the minor shall be discharged within 48 hours to the custody of such consenting parent unless the minor’s continued hospitalization is authorized pursuant to §

16.1-339

,

16.1-340.1

, or

16.1-345

. If the 48-hour time period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 48 hours shall extend to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed. If a minor 14 or older objects to further treatment, the mental health facility shall (i) immediately notify the consenting parent of the minor’s objections and (ii) provide to the consenting parent a summary, prepared by the Office of the Attorney General, of the procedures for requesting continued treatment of the minor pursuant to §

16.1-339

,

16.1-340.1

, or

16.1-345

.

Inpatient treatment of a minor hospitalized under this section may not exceed 90 consecutive days unless it has been authorized by appropriate hospital medical personnel, based upon their written findings that the criteria set forth in subsection B of this section continue to be met, after such persons have examined the minor and interviewed the consenting parent and reviewed reports submitted by members of the facility staff familiar with the minor’s condition.

Any minor admitted under this section while younger than 14 and his consenting parent shall be informed orally and in writing by the director of the facility for inpatient treatment within 10 days of his fourteenth birthday that continued voluntary treatment under the authority of this section requires his consent.

Any minor 14 years of age or older who joins in an application and consents to admission pursuant to subsection A, shall, in addition to his parent, have the right to access his health information. The concurrent authorization of both the parent and the minor shall be required to disclose such minor’s health information.

A minor who has been hospitalized while properly detained by a juvenile and domestic relations district court or circuit court shall be returned to the detention home, shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours following completion of a period of inpatient treatment, unless the court having jurisdiction over the case orders that the minor be released from custody.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 2005, cc. 181, 227; 2008, cc. 783, 808; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2015, cc. 504, 543.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 181 and 227 are identical, and added subsection G and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 783 and 808 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and added subsection H.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subsection B, in the last paragraph, inserted “in lieu of,” “a preadmission screening report conducted by an employee or designee of the community services board,” and “or preadmission screening report” and substituted “qualified evaluator or employee or designee of the community services board” for “evaluator”; in subsection D, substituted “16.1-340.1” for “16.1-340”; and in subsection H, inserted “shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 504 and 543 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection D.

§ 16.1-339.
Parental admission of an objecting minor 14 years of age or older.

A minor 14 years of age or older who (i) objects to admission or (ii) is incapable of making an informed decision may be admitted to a willing facility for up to 120 hours, pending the review required by subsections B and C, upon the application of a parent. If admission is sought to a state hospital, the community services board serving the area in which the minor resides shall provide the preadmission screening report required by subsection B of §

16.1-338

and shall ensure that the necessary written findings, except the minor’s consent, have been made before approving the admission.

A minor admitted under this section shall be examined within 24 hours of his admission by a qualified evaluator designated by the community services board serving the area where the facility is located. If the 24-hour time period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 24 hours shall extend to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. The evaluator shall prepare a report that shall include written findings as to whether:

The minor appears to have a mental illness serious enough to warrant inpatient treatment and is reasonably likely to benefit from the treatment;

The minor has been provided with a clinically appropriate explanation of the nature and purpose of the treatment; and

All available modalities of treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment have been considered and no less restrictive alternative is available that would offer comparable benefits to the minor.The qualified evaluator shall submit his report to the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the facility is located.

Upon admission of a minor under this section, the facility shall file a petition for judicial approval no sooner than 24 hours and no later than 120 hours after admission with the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the facility is located. To the extent available, the petition shall contain the information required by §

16.1-339.1

. A copy of this petition shall be delivered to the minor’s consenting parent. Upon receipt of the petition and of the evaluator’s report submitted pursuant to subsection B, the judge shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor and counsel to represent the minor, unless it has been determined that the minor has retained counsel. A copy of the evaluator’s report shall be provided to the minor’s counsel and guardian ad litem. The court and the guardian ad litem shall review the petition and evaluator’s report and shall ascertain the views of the minor, the minor’s consenting parent, the evaluator, and the attending psychiatrist. The court shall conduct its review in such place and manner, including the facility, as it deems to be in the best interests of the minor. Based upon its review and the recommendations of the guardian ad litem, the court shall order one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds that the minor does not meet the criteria for admission specified in subsection B, the court shall issue an order directing the facility to release the minor into the custody of the parent who consented to the minor’s admission. However, nothing herein shall be deemed to affect the terms and provisions of any valid court order of custody affecting the minor.

If the court finds that the minor meets the criteria for admission specified in subsection B, the court shall issue an order authorizing continued hospitalization of the minor for up to 90 days on the basis of the parent’s consent.Within 10 days after the admission of a minor under this section, the director of the facility or the director’s designee shall ensure that an individualized plan of treatment has been prepared by the provider responsible for the minor’s treatment and has been explained to the parent consenting to the admission and to the minor. A copy of the plan shall also be provided to the guardian ad litem and to counsel for the minor. The minor shall be involved in the preparation of the plan to the maximum feasible extent consistent with his ability to understand and participate, and the minor’s family shall be involved to the maximum extent consistent with the minor’s treatment needs. The plan shall include a preliminary plan for placement and aftercare upon completion of inpatient treatment and shall include specific behavioral and emotional goals against which the success of treatment may be measured.

If the court determines that the available information is insufficient to permit an informed determination regarding whether the minor meets the criteria specified in subsection B, the court shall schedule a commitment hearing that shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures specified in §§

16.1-341

through

16.1-345

. The minor may be detained in the hospital for up to 120 additional hours pending the holding of the commitment hearing.

A minor admitted under this section who rescinds his objection may be retained in the hospital pursuant to §

16.1-338

.

If the parent who consented to a minor’s admission under this section revokes his consent at any time, the minor shall be released within 48 hours to the parent’s custody unless the minor’s continued hospitalization is authorized pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

or

16.1-345

. If the 48-hour time period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 48 hours shall extend to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed.

A minor who has been hospitalized while properly detained by a juvenile and domestic relations district court or circuit court shall be returned to the detention home, shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours following completion of a period of inpatient treatment, unless the court having jurisdiction over the case orders that the minor be released from custody.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 2005, c. 716; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2008, cc. 139, 774, 783, 807, 808; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2015, cc. 504, 535, 543.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, in subsection B, inserted “or behavioral health authority” preceding “serving the area,” and substituted “that” for “which” preceding “shall include written findings”; deleted “or special justice appointed pursuant to § 37.1-88” preceding “shall appoint a guardian” in subsection C; substituted “that” for “which” preceding “shall be conducted” in subdivision C 3; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and deleted “juvenile and domestic relations district court” preceding “judge” in the third sentence of the introductory paragraph in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 139 and 774 are identical, and, in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted the (i) designator and “or (ii) is incapable of making an informed decision,” and made a related change.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 783 and 808 are identical, and substituted “96 hours” for “72 hours” in subsection A and subdivision C 3; in subsection C, deleted “immediately” following “the facility shall” and inserted “no sooner than 24 hours and no later than 96 hours after admission” near the middle of the first sentence; and added the last sentence in subsection E.

The 2008 amendment by c. 807, in subsection C, inserted “and counsel to represent the minor, unless it has been determined that the minor has retained counsel” at the end of the third sentence; and in subdivision C 2, inserted “and to counsel for the minor” at the end of the second sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and deleted “or behavioral health authority” following “board” in subsections A and B; in subsection C, inserted the second and fifth sentences; and added subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “preadmission screening report” for “examination”; in subsection B, deleted “who is not and will not be treating the minor and who has no significant financial interest in the minor’s hospitalization” from the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subsection E, substituted “16.1-340.1” for “16.1-340”; and in subsection F, inserted “shelter care, or other facility approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice by the sheriff serving the jurisdiction where the minor was detained within 24 hours.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 504 and 543 are identical, and deleted “of this section” following “subsections B and C” in subsection A and rewrote subdivisions B 1 through 3, which read “1. Because of mental illness, the minor (i) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats or (ii) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control; 2. The minor is in need of inpatient treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment; and 3. Inpatient treatment is the least restrictive alternative that meets the minor’s needs. The qualified evaluator shall submit his report to the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the facility is located.”

The 2015 amendment by c. 535 substituted “120 hours” for “96 hours” throughout the section.

§ 16.1-339.1.
Minors in detention homes or shelter care facilities.

If a minor admitted to a mental health facility pursuant to this article was in a detention home or a shelter care facility at the time of his admission, the director of the detention home or shelter care facility or his designee shall provide, if available, the charges against the minor that are the basis of the detention and the names and addresses of the minor’s parents and the juvenile and domestic relations district court ordering the minor’s placement in detention or shelter care to the mental health facility and to the juvenile and domestic relations district court for the jurisdiction in which the mental health facility is located if different from the court ordering the minor’s placement in detention or shelter care.

History.

2009, cc. 455, 555.